Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
PART 2 Capitol Art Standards Commission

Law reviews.

For article, “The Protection of Visual Artists Through Consignment of Art Statutes,” see 18 J. Intell. Prop. L. 551 (2011).

45-13-70.
Creation of commission; membership; appointment; staffing.

There is created the Capitol Art Standards Commission, which is assigned to the office of the Secretary of State for administrative purposes only, as prescribed in Code Section 50-4-3.

The Capitol Art Standards Commission shall be composed of 16 members. Three members shall be appointed by the Governor, one of whom shall be designated as chairperson. Three members shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Assignments and three members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives. One member each shall be appointed by the Georgia Historical Society, the Georgia Council for the Humanities, and the Georgia Council for the Arts. One member each shall be appointed by the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia and the Georgia Foundation for Independent Colleges, each of whom shall be proficient in the history of the State of Georgia. Each of the appointed members shall serve two-year terms of office and shall be eligible to succeed themselves. In addition, the director of the Georgia Capitol Museum or his or her designee and the Secretary of State or his or her designee shall be a member of the commission. Vacancies in the positions of appointed members of the commission shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term of office by the original appointing authority.

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation but members of the commission who are not state officials or employees shall receive the same expense allowance per day as that received by a member of the General Assembly for each day such member of the commission is in attendance at a meeting of such commission, plus either reimbursement for actual transportation costs while traveling by public carrier or the same mileage allowance for use of a personal car in connection with such attendance as members of the General Assembly receive. Members of the commission who are state officials or employees shall receive reimbursement for actual transportation costs in accordance with the policies of their respective agencies.

Membership on the commission does not constitute a public office, and no member shall be disqualified from holding public office by reason of his or her membership.

The commission, with the approval of the Governor, may employ such professional, technical, or clerical personnel as deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-70

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 149, § 1/HB 978; Ga. L. 2011, p. 617, § 3/SB 190; Ga. L. 2016, p. 846, § 45/HB 737.

The 2016 amendment,

effective May 3, 2016, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised capitalization in subsection (a).

Cross references.

Art in state buildings, T. 8, C. 5.

45-13-71.
Duties and responsibilities of commission.

The Capitol Art Standards Commission shall have the following duties and responsibilities:

To meet at such times and places as it shall determine necessary or convenient to perform its duties. The commission shall also meet on the call of the chairperson or the Governor;

To maintain minutes of its meetings;

To adopt rules and regulations for the transaction of its business;

To organize itself as it deems appropriate to carry out its functions;

To be responsible for developing policies and procedures for and to oversee the acquisition, installation, preservation, maintenance, display, and storage of all capitol artwork. As used in this part, the term “capitol artwork” means visual art of museum quality owned by the State of Georgia that is displayed in or on the grounds of the capitol or is held for the purpose of future display to include, but not be limited to, portraits, paintings, sculptures, and plaques. The Georgia Capitol Museum shall remain responsible for the documentation, appraisal, control, handling, and conservation of the present and future artwork in the capitol art collection;

To establish a collection policy for all capitol artwork;

To develop standards and procedures for determining whether to acquire new artwork which shall include criteria for judging the relevance of the subject, the historical significance to the State of Georgia, and the quality of the artwork produced and an approval process for such acquisitions. No artwork shall be acquired or installed without final approval of the commission;

To develop a process for the selection, placement, installation, and rotation of capitol artwork in the capitol, in the capitol museum, in the areas of the capitol museum designated as the Georgia Capitol Agricultural History Museum areas, and on the capitol grounds;

To develop policies and procedures for outgoing loans from the capitol art collection and for temporary displays of artwork in the capitol, in the capitol museum, in the areas of the capitol museum designated as the Georgia Capitol Agricultural History Museum areas, and on the capitol grounds;

To develop deaccession policies and procedures for artwork in the capitol art collection that should be removed based upon poor quality or lack of relevance or similar factors; and

To perform such other duties and responsibilities as required by law.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-71

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 149, § 1/HB 978; Ga. L. 2014, p. 693, § 1/SB 274.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, inserted “in the areas of the capitol museum designated as the Georgia Capitol Agricultural History Museum areas,” in paragraphs (8) and (9) and inserted “capitol” preceding “artwork” in paragraph (8).

45-13-72.
Submission of recommendations to achieve highest museum standards; designation of area as Georgia Capitol Agricultural History Museum.

The Capitol Art Standards Commission may recommend to the Governor and the General Assembly changes in state statutes, policies, budgets, and standards relating to the capitol art collection, with the objective of keeping the collection at the highest museum standards.

The Capitol Art Standards Commission, in cooperation with the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia and the Commission on the Preservation of the State Capitol, shall designate areas within the capitol museum as the Georgia Capitol Agricultural History Museum areas. Such areas shall include information, artifacts, photographs, monuments, or other related items which tell the history and importance of agriculture to this state’s economic growth. Except as provided for in this part, the Georgia Capitol Agricultural History Museum areas of the capitol museum shall be maintained, operated, and managed in the same manner as the other areas of the capitol museum.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-72

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 149, § 1/HB 978; Ga. L. 2014, p. 693, § 2/SB 274.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

45-13-73.
Funding; acceptance of gifts and donations.

The Capitol Art Standards Commission may accept federal funds granted by Congress or executive order for the purposes of this part as well as gifts and donations from individuals, private organizations, or foundations. The acceptance and use of federal funds shall not commit state funds and shall not place an obligation upon the General Assembly to continue the purposes for which the federal funds are made available.

The Capitol Art Standards Commission may accept gifts and donations from individuals, private organizations, and foundations which have been designated for the purpose of providing for and maintaining capitol artwork for the Georgia Capitol Agricultural History Museum areas. Such designated funds received by the commission shall be maintained in a separate, interest-bearing account and shall not lapse. Such funds shall only be expended on the establishment and maintenance of the Georgia Capitol Agricultural History Museum areas.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-73

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 149, § 1/HB 978; Ga. L. 2014, p. 693, § 3/SB 274.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

45-13-74.
Provisions are general law; no special law regarding capitol artwork.

The General Assembly finds that this part constitutes a general law within the meaning of Article III, Section VI, Paragraph IV(a) of the Constitution. The General Assembly intends that there be no enactment of any bill or resolution proposing a special law with respect to capitol artwork.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-13-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 149, § 1/HB 978.